Washington statutes.
RCW 19.150.170

Limit on value of personal property—Liability.

If a rental agreement contains a condition on [the] occupant's use of the space that specifies a limit on the value of personal property that may be stored, that limit is the maximum value of the stored personal property in the occupant's space for the purposes of the [self-service] storage facility owner's liability only.

[ 2015 c 13 s 5.]